Utah statutes.
54-8b-7.   Continuous jurisdiction of commission -- Orders.

The commission shall retain continuous jurisdiction over every telecommunications corporation or public telecommunications service exempted under this chapter and may exercise any statutory grant of power pertaining thereto, including the power to revoke or modify any order approving an exemption from regulation.  The commission may, after notice and hearing, revoke or modify an order approving exemption, if after considering the factors in Subsection 54-8b-3(5), the commission finds such modification or revocation to be in the public interest.



Amended by Chapter 30, 1992 General Session

